Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 1

General Provisions

65-3-101. All railways subject to chapter.

All railways are declared subject to this chapter, and all individuals, companies, corporations, trustees, receivers, and lessees, owning, operating, and managing such railways for the transportation of freight and passengers, are declared common carriers.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 14; Shan., § 3059a39; Code 1932, § 5415; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-301.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 11 provided:

“In order to carry out its functions, duties and responsibilities maintained under the provisions of Acts 1995, ch. 305, the public service commission shall retain and have the authority to exercise any and all of its powers and duties existing under title 65 prior to enactment of Acts 1995, ch. 305, including, but not limited to, the power to subpoena, the power to take evidence, and the power to examine. Upon the termination of the public service commission, the Tennessee regulatory authority is expressly granted the same powers and duties as set forth above for the public service commission in order to carry out its responsibilities established by the provisions of Acts 1995, ch. 305.”

Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 44 provided:

“(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon the effective date of this section [July 1, 1995] all employees of the public service commission charged with the responsibility of regulating and enforcing the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, Chapter 3, and Chapter 5, Part 1 [repealed], and Chapters 11 and 12, and any other employees of the public service commission necessary to assist in such regulating and enforcing, shall be transferred to the department of transportation, created by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-101. (b) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, papers or other writings in the possession of the public service commission with respect to administering the provisions of Title 65, assigned to the department of transportation by this act, shall be transferred to and remain in custody of the department of transportation. (c) All leases, contracts and all contract rights and responsibilities in existence with the public service commission with respect to the duties transferred by this section shall be preserved and transferred to the department of transportation. (d) All assets, liabilities and obligations of the public service commission with respect to the duties transferred by this section shall become the assets, liabilities and obligations of the department of transportation. (e) Any revenues from rates, fares, charges, fines, and other moneys received pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, Chapter 12, shall be allocated to the department of transportation as approved by the transition team pursuant to Section 48 [§ 65-1-301 (now § 65-1-201)] to implement the provisions of this act. (f) The commissioner of transportation shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to Title 4, Chapter 5, to effectuate the purposes of this act.”

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 12; 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. Transfer of railroad authority to department of transportation, OAG 97-026, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 25 (3/31/97).

65-3-102. Interstate commerce excepted.

This chapter and chapter 5 of this title shall be construed to apply to and affect only the transportation of passengers, freight cars and services to persons or between points within this state.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 30; Shan., § 3059a 67; mod. Code 1932, § 5443; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-302.

65-3-103. Uniform laws.

It is the duty of the department of transportation, by correspondence, conventions, or otherwise, to confer with such departments of other states and the interstate commerce commission, and such persons from states which have no railroad commission, as the governors of such states may appoint, for the purpose of agreeing, if practicable, upon a draft of statutes to be submitted to the legislature of each state, which shall secure uniform control of transportation in the several states, and from one (1) state into or through another state, as will best subserve the interest of trade and commerce of the whole country; and the department of transportation shall include in its annual report to the governor an abstract of the proceedings of any such conference or convention.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 29; Shan., § 3059a66; Code 1932, § 5442; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-303; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

65-3-104. Power to adopt rules and regulations.

The department of transportation has the power to make all needed rules for its government and for its proceedings, and regulate the mode of all investigations and hearings of railroad companies and other parties before it, and to adopt and enforce such rules and regulations and modes of procedure as it may deem proper for the hearing and determination of all complaints made by any railroad company or other parties; provided, that no person desiring to be present at any such investigation by the department of transportation shall be denied admission.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 8; 1907, ch. 390, § 2; Shan., § 3059a23; Code 1932, § 5399; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-304; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339 (1947-1948).

65-3-105. Enforcement of regulations and orders.

The department of transportation is to perform all duties imposed upon it by this chapter and chapter 5 of this title, and see that such companies shall comply with all such regulations and orders as it may reasonably and lawfully make. If any such company fails or refuses to comply with such reasonable and lawful regulations and orders, it shall be the duty of the department of transportation to enforce the same. Power is given the department of transportation to enforce the same by mandamus or mandatory injunction, or by other summary proceedings provided by law. In all such proceedings, the orders, regulations, rates and tariffs made and fixed by the department of transportation pursuant to this chapter and chapter 5 of this title shall be taken and treated as prima facie reasonable and valid. It is made the duty of the courts having jurisdiction in such proceedings to hear and determine all such summary causes as speedily as practicable, giving preference or priority thereto as in revenue causes.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 32; 1915, ch. 92, § 1; Shan., § 3059a69; Acts 1921, ch. 70, § 2; mod. Code 1932, § 5445; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-305; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339 (1947-1948).

Collateral References.

Constitutionality and construction of statute imposing upon public service corporation expense of investigation of its affairs. 101 A.L.R. 197.

Federal control as affecting right to enforce order. 4 A.L.R. 1680, 8 A.L.R. 969, 10 A.L.R. 956, 11 A.L.R. 1450, 14 A.L.R. 234, 19 A.L.R. 678, 52 A.L.R. 296.

Necessity of some evidence at hearing to support decision of commission. 123 A.L.R. 1349.

Railroad company as proper party to proceeding during federal control to compel trains to stop at certain city. 19 A.L.R. 678, 52 A.L.R. 296, 137 A.L.R. 504.

65-3-106. Information concerning company affairs.

The department of transportation shall inform itself fully and thoroughly in regard to the affairs of every company doing business in this state, and under its jurisdiction. It shall cause to be prepared suitable blanks with questions calculated to elicit all information concerning same, and, as often as may be necessary, furnish the blanks to each such company.

Each company receiving from the department of transportation any such blanks shall cause the same to be properly filled out, so as to answer fully and correctly each question therein propounded, and in case such company is unable to answer any question, it shall give a satisfactory reason for its failure, and the answer, duly sworn to by the proper officer of the company, shall be returned to the department of transportation at its office in Nashville within thirty (30) days from the receipt of same.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 8; Shan., §§ 3059a24, 3059a25; Code 1932, §§ 5400, 5401; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-306, 65-307; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

65-3-107. Company reports.

It is the duty of each and every company, corporation, or individual, owning, operating, or managing such a company in this state, to send to the department of transportation at its office in Nashville, the monthly, quarterly, and annual statements of the operations of such company or individual, if such reports are issued; if not, then such company or individual shall send such reports as may be issued at any special or regular time. The president or chief officer of each and every such company shall, on or before February 1 of each year, make and transmit to the department of transportation at its office in Nashville, under oath of the president or chief officer of the company, a full and true statement of the affairs of the company as the same existed on the preceding January 1, in accordance with the direction and schedules prepared and furnished by the department of transportation.

All common carriers shall send a copy of all safety inspection reports of such common carrier's tracks or track system which are prepared for or made by the federal railroad administration to the department of transportation. “Common carrier” is understood not to apply to private in-plant or intra-plant trackage owned or leased by private corporations which do not engage in serving the public as common carriers.

Any officer, agent, or employee failing or refusing to make, under oath, any report required by the department of transportation, within the time required, or failing or refusing to answer fully under oath, if required, any inquiry propounded by the department of transportation, or who shall, in any way, hinder or obstruct the department of transportation, in the discharge of its duties, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, §§ 12, 13; Shan., §§ 3059a37, 3059a38; Code 1932, §§ 5413, 5414; Acts 1979, ch. 423, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-308, 65-309; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

65-3-108. Powers of department of transportation to examine.

The department of transportation is given full power to examine the books and papers of the companies, and to examine, under oath, the officers, agents, and employees of the companies and any other persons, to procure the necessary information to intelligently and justly discharge its duties and carry out the provisions of this chapter and chapter 5 of this title.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 8; Shan., § 3059a26; Code 1932, § 5402; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-310; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

65-3-109. Confidential information.

The department of transportation shall not give publicity to any contracts, leases, or engagements obtained by it in its official capacity, if the interests of any company would thereby be injuriously affected, unless, in the judgment of the department of transportation, the public interest requires it.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 11; Shan., § 3059a36; Code 1932, § 5412; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-311; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

65-3-110. Power of department of transportation to take evidence.

The department of transportation has the power to examine, under oath, any person, or the directors, officers, agents, and employees of any such corporation doing business in this state, concerning the management of its affairs, and to obtain information pursuant to this chapter and chapter 5 of this title, and has the power to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses, to compel the production of books and papers, and to administer oaths.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 9; Shan., § 3059a27; Code 1932, § 5403; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-312; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

65-3-111. Refusal to obey process or testify — Penalty.

Any person who neglects or refuses to obey the process of subpoenas issued by the department of transportation or who, being in attendance, refuses to testify commits a Class C misdemeanor. Each refusal to obey the subpoena or to testify is a separate offense.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 9; Shan., § 3059a28; Code 1932, § 5404; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-313; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

65-3-112. Power to issue subpoenas.

The department of transportation, in making any examination or investigation provided for, has the power to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses by such rules as it may prescribe.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 10; Shan., § 3059a29; Code 1932, § 5405; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-314; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339 (1947-1948).

65-3-113. Compensation of witnesses.

Each witness who appears before the department of transportation, by order of the department of transportation, shall receive for attendance the compensation provided by law, which shall be paid by the state treasurer on warrant of the commissioner of finance and administration, upon the presentation of proper voucher sworn to by such witness, and approved by the commissioner of transportation; provided, that no witness shall be entitled to any witness fees or mileage who is directly or indirectly interested in any such company in this state or out of it, or who is in any way interested in any stock, bond, mortgage, security, or earnings of any such company, or who shall be the agent or employee of such company, or an officer thereof when summoned at the instance of such company. No witness furnished with free transportation shall receive compensation for the distance traveled on such free transportation.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 10; Shan., § 3059a30; Code 1932, § 5406; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 24, 29; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-315; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

65-3-114. Witness failing to obey subpoena.

In case any witness fails or refuses to obey a subpoena, the department of transportation may issue an attachment for such witness, directed to any sheriff or constable of the state, and compel the witness to attend before the department of transportation and give testimony upon such matters as shall be lawfully required by it.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 10; Shan., § 3059a31; Code 1932, § 5407; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-316; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

65-3-115. Witness failing to attend or answer questions.

If a witness, after being duly summoned, fails or refuses to attend, or to answer any question propounded to such witness, which such witness would be required to answer if in court, the department of transportation shall have power to fine and imprison such witness for contempt in the same manner that the judge of any court of competent jurisdiction might do under similar circumstances.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 10; Shan., § 3059a32; Code 1932, § 5408; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-317; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

Code Commission Notes.

Although Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113 indicated that the penalty provisions in this section should be rewritten to indicate that a violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor, the code commission has decided that this section should not be rewritten to reflect Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Punishment for contempt, § 29-9-103, Tenn. R. Crim. P. 42.

Law Reviews.

An Examination of the Tennessee Law of Administrative Procedure (George Street Boone), 1 Vand. L. Rev. 339 (1947-1948).

65-3-116. Officers or employees testifying exempt from indictment.

No officer, agent, servant, or employee of any such company, who appears and testifies before the department of transportation under this chapter or chapter 5 of this title or in any civil or criminal proceedings instituted by the department of transportation under this chapter or chapter 5 of this title, shall be liable to indictment or presentment for any violation of this chapter or chapter 5 of this title about which such person so testifies.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 10; Shan., § 3059a33; Code 1932, § 5409; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-318; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

65-3-117. Depositions.

The department of transportation shall, in all cases, have a right in its discretion to issue proper process and take depositions instead of compelling personal attendance of witnesses.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 10; Shan., § 3059a34; Code 1932, § 5410; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-319; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

65-3-118. Fees of sheriff or constable executing process.

The sheriff or constable executing any process issued under this chapter and chapter 5 of this title shall receive such compensation as may be allowed by the department of transportation, not to exceed the fees prescribed by law for similar services.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 10; Shan., § 3059a35; Code 1932, § 5411; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-320; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

65-3-119. Penalties generally.

It is the duty of the district attorneys general to bring suit in the name of the state on the relation of the department of transportation, in any court having jurisdiction thereof, to recover any penalty imposed by this chapter and chapter 5 of this title.

If any company, corporation or lessee knowingly violates this chapter or chapter 5 of this title, or does any act prohibited therein, or fails or refuses to perform any duty required by the department of transportation pursuant to this chapter or chapter 5 of this title for which a penalty has not therein been provided, for each and every such act of violation it shall pay to the state of Tennessee a penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

All penalties provided for in this chapter or chapter 5 of this title shall be recovered, and suit thereon shall be brought, in the name of the state of Tennessee.

All penalties and fines recovered shall be paid into the state treasury.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, §§ 20, 25, 26; Shan., §§ 3059a46, 3059a55, 3059a59, 3059a60; Code 1932, §§ 5422, 5431, 5435, 5436; modified; Acts 1980, ch. 760, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-321 — 65-324; Acts 1991, ch. 138, § 2; 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

Cross-References. District attorneys general to prosecute all suits, § 65-3-120.

65-3-120. Civil and criminal suits.

The circuit, chancery courts and courts of general sessions have jurisdiction of all suits of a civil nature arising under this chapter and chapter 5 of this title, according to the nature of the suit and the amount involved, and the circuit and criminal courts have jurisdiction of all criminal proceedings so arising.

The district attorney general of the judicial district in which the suit is to be instituted shall prosecute suits so brought in the name of the state.

The department of transportation shall report all such violations with the facts in its possession to such district attorney general and request the district attorney general to institute the proper proceedings.

All suits between the state and any such company shall have precedence in all courts over all other suits pending therein, and the judges of the courts are directed to advance such suits on their dockets.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, §§ 26, 27; Shan., §§ 3059a56, 3059a61, 3059a63, 3059a64; Code 1932, §§ 5432, 5437, 5439, 5440; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-325 — 65-328; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

Cross-References. Suits for penalties, § 65-3-119.

65-3-121. Indictments — Prosecutor.

Indictments or presentments under this chapter and chapter 5 of this title shall be only upon recommendation or request of the department of transportation, filed in the court having jurisdiction of the offense.

The department of transportation or any member thereof, or any person authorized by law to prosecute criminal cases, may be prosecutor.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 26; Shan., § 3059a57; Code 1932, § 5433; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-329; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

65-3-122. Limitation of actions.

All prosecutions or actions under this chapter and chapter 5 of this title shall be commenced within one (1) year after the offense has been committed or the cause of action has accrued, or the same shall be barred.

Acts 1897, ch. 10, § 26; Shan., § 3059a58; Code 1932, § 5434; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-330; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 10.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 49.

65-3-123. Abatement of dangerous or unhealthy conditions.

The department of transportation has the power and authority relative to commercial railroads, interurban railroads, and street railroads to inspect the conditions existing on all trains operating in Tennessee, along the rail rights-of-way, in rail yards and terminals, and at rail loading and unloading facilities connected to property owned or operated by the railroads, except for those areas of loading and unloading facilities requiring no access for service by Class I railroads. This power and authority is in addition to those granted in § 65-11-107. Such inspection shall be conducted for the purpose of assuring the safety, health and comfort of rail customers, the general public and rail employees, and for the purpose of abating and removing any dangerous or unhealthy conditions found to exist in these locations.

The department of transportation, on its own motion or on the petition of any citizen, shall have a hearing on the question embraced within this section, as to the presence of dangerous or unhealthy conditions of trains or along the rights-of-way, yards and terminals of all commercial railroads and street railroads.

It is the duty of the department of transportation, after the hearing, to order the abatement and removal of any dangerous or unhealthy condition, if found to exist, and to order improvements to be made remedying same, when such conditions are shown to be dangerous to the health and safety of the general public or the employees.

Acts 1939, ch. 130, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 5449; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-331; Acts 1991, ch. 138, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, §§ 10, 12.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Monopolies and Restraints of Trade, § 4; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 4.

Law Reviews.

The Indeterminate Permit for Public Utilities in Tennessee (Henry B. Witham), 6 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1927).